Vermont, session 2025-2026, H660.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Opioid Abatement Special Fund * * *
Sec. 1. APPROPRIATIONS; OPIOID ABATEMENT SPECIAL FUND
(a) In fiscal year 2027, the following sums shall be appropriated from the
Opioid Abatement Special Fund established in 18 V.S.A. § 4774:
(1)(A) $455,000.00 to the Department of Health to fund 26 outreach or
case management staff positions within the preferred provider network for the
provision of services that increase the motivation of and engagement with
individuals with substance use disorder in settings such as police barracks,
shelters, social service organizations, and elsewhere in the community.
(B) It is the intent of the General Assembly that these positions shall
be funded annually by the Opioid Abatement Special Fund unless and until the
Special Fund does not have sufficient monies to fund this expenditure.
(2)(A) $1,600,000.00 to the Department of Health for recovery
residences certified by the Vermont Alliance for Recovery Residences.
(B) It is the intent of the General Assembly that recovery residences
be funded annually by the Opioid Abatement Special Fund unless and until the
Special Fund does not have sufficient monies to fund this expenditure.
VT LEG #390224 v.1

No. 141 Page 2 of 12
2026
(3)(A) $850,000.00 to the Department of Health for syringe services.
(B) It is the intent of the General Assembly that syringe services be
funded annually by the Opioid Abatement Special Fund unless and until the
Special Fund does not have sufficient monies to fund this expenditure.
(4) $1,100,000.00 to the Department of Corrections to provide peer
recovery center coaches in Vermont correctional facilities and in probation and
parole offices to provide group and individual coaching and reentry support,
which shall not be used to cover administrative expenses.
(5) $250,000.00 to the Department for Children and Families’ Office of
Economic Opportunity to support long-term programs at shelters for
individuals experiencing homelessness, including harm-reduction supports,
transportation to recovery meetings and appointments, and clinical nursing
programs.
(6)(A) $1,200,000.00 to the Department of Health for both the creation
of new opioid use disorder residential treatment beds at American Society of
Addiction Medicine level 3.1 and for the creation of new recovery residence
beds at National Alliance for Recovery Residences (NARR) certification level
III or above with priority given to unserved and underserved regions of the
State.
(B) It is a priority of the General Assembly to fund treatment as part
of opioid use disorder recovery.
VT LEG #390224 v.1

No. 141 Page 3 of 12
2026
(7) $248,000.00 to the Department of Health for the Prehospital
Vermont EMS Buprenorphine Treatment (PREVENT) Program to expand
training for emergency service providers on carrying buprenorphine and
administering buprenorphine after administering naloxone.
(8) $35,000.00 to the Department of Health to subsidize room and board
for individuals in Rutland Mental Health Services’ transitional housing
program.
(9) $237,646.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to
Springfield Project ACTION to support public safety enhancement team
coordinator positions in Bennington, Springfield, Brattleboro, St. Johnsbury,
and central Vermont for the purposes of providing administrative support,
meeting facilitation, data tracking, outreach event coordination, and
sustainability planning.
(10) $500,000.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to
recovery centers, upon consultation with the Vermont Recovery Network to
determine allocations to individual recovery centers.
(11) $287,000.00 to the Department of Public Safety to provide funding
for expanding the Public Safety Enhancement Team’s harm reduction and
strategic community intervention efforts.
(12) $875,000.00 to the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and
Independent Living to fund specialized employment services to individuals
with opioid use disorder through HireAbility Vermont.
VT LEG #390224 v.1

No. 141 Page 4 of 12
2026
(b) Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 703, unless reverted by a future act of the
General Assembly, the appropriations made in accordance with this section
shall carry forward until fully expended.
Sec. 2. LEGISLATIVE INTENT; OVERDOSE PREVENTION CENTER
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly to consider the operational
status and funding needs of Burlington’s overdose prevention center during the
fiscal year 2027 budget adjustment process. If the General Assembly finds that
a location for the overdose prevention center has been procured by lease or
purchase, the overdose prevention center is being fit up for its intended use,
and the overdose prevention center is currently or will imminently become
operational, it intends to appropriate up to $1,100,000.00 to the Department of
Health for the purpose of awarding a grant to the City of Burlington for the
work of the overdose prevention center.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to continue to appropriate funds
annually from the Opioid Abatement Special Fund through at least fiscal year
2028 for the purpose of awarding grants to the City of Burlington for the
operation of the overdose prevention center, unless the Special Fund does not
have sufficient monies to fund this expenditure.
Sec. 3. LEGISLATIVE INTENT; HIREABILITY
It is the intent of the General Assembly that in fiscal year 2028 and
thereafter, HireAbility Vermont be funded using General Fund monies.
VT LEG #390224 v.1

No. 141 Page 5 of 12
2026
Sec. 4. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 22, Sec. 14, as amended by 2024 Acts and
Resolves No. 113, Sec. C.112, is further amended to read:
Sec. 14. APPROPRIATION; OPIOID ABATEMENT SPECIAL FUND
In fiscal year 2023, the following monies shall be appropriated from the
Opioid Abatement Special Fund pursuant to 18 V.S.A. § 4774:
(1)(A) $1,500,000 divided equally between four opioid treatment
programs to cover costs associated with partnering with other health care
providers to expand satellite locations for the dosing of medications, including
costs associated with the satellite locations’ physical facilities, staff time at the
satellite locations, and staff time at opioid treatment programs to prepare
medications and coordinate with satellite locations;
(B) the satellite locations established pursuant to this subdivision (1)
shall be located in Addison County, and eastern or southern Vermont, and in a
facility operated by the Department of Corrections;
(2) $500,000 to establish a second Chittenden Clinic Addiction
Treatment Center satellite location in northwestern Vermont;
* * *
Sec. 5. 18 V.S.A. § 4772 is amended to read:
§ 4772. OPIOID SETTLEMENT ADVISORY COMMITTEE
* * *
(c) Powers and duties. The Advisory Committee shall demonstrate broad
ongoing consultation with individuals living with opioid use disorder about
VT LEG #390224 v.1

No. 141 Page 6 of 12
2026
their direct experience with related systems, including medication for opioid
use disorder, residential treatment, recovery services, harm reduction services,
overdose, supervision by the Department of Corrections, and involvement with
the Department for Children and Families’ Family Services Division. To that
end, the Advisory Committee shall demonstrate consultation with individuals
with direct lived experience of opioid use disorder, frontline support
professionals, the Substance Misuse Oversight Prevention and Advisory
Council, the Health Equity Advisory Commission, and other stakeholders to
identify spending priorities as related to opioid use disorder prevention,
intervention, treatment, and recovery services and harm reduction strategies for
the purpose of providing recommendations to the Governor, the Department of
Health, and the General Assembly on prioritizing spending from the Opioid
Abatement Special Fund. Each ongoing funding proposal considered by the
Advisory Committee shall include a sustainability plan from the applicant to
ensure consideration of future expenses and available resources apart from the
Opioid Abatement Special Fund. The Advisory Committee shall consider:
(1) the impact of the opioid crisis on communities throughout Vermont,
including communities’ abatement needs and proposals for abatement
strategies and responses;
(2) the perspectives of and proposals from opioid use disorder
prevention coalitions, recovery centers, and medication for opioid use disorder
providers; and
VT LEG #390224 v.1

No. 141 Page 7 of 12
2026
(3) the ongoing challenges of the opioid crisis on marginalized
populations, including individuals who have a lived experience of opioid use
disorder.
* * *
(e) Presentation Recommendations. Annually, the Advisory Committee
shall vote on its recommendations. Recommendations shall be informed by
outcomes and measurements reported by previous grantees. In developing its
recommendations, the Advisory Committee shall consult with the Office of the
Attorney General regarding allowable uses of the Special Fund. If the
recommendations are supported by an affirmative vote of the majority, the
Advisory Committee shall present its recommendations for expenditures from
the Opioid Abatement Special Fund established pursuant to this subchapter to
the Department of Health and concurrently submit its recommendations in
writing to the House Committees on Appropriations and on Human Services
and the Senate Committees on Appropriations and on Health and Welfare. The
Advisory Committee’s written recommendations shall address how each
recommendation meets one or more of the criteria listed in subsections 4774(b)
and (c) of this subchapter. The Advisory Committee shall give priority
consideration to services requiring funding on an ongoing basis.
* * *
Sec. 6. 18 V.S.A. § 4774 is amended to read:
§ 4774. OPIOID ABATEMENT SPECIAL FUND
VT LEG #390224 v.1

No. 141 Page 8 of 12
2026
(a)(1) There is created the Opioid Abatement Special Fund, a special fund
established and managed pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5 and
administered by the Department of Health. The Opioid Abatement Special
Fund shall consist of all abatement account fund monies disbursed to the
Department from the national abatement account fund, the national opioid
abatement trust, the supplemental opioid abatement fund, or any other
settlement funds that must be utilized exclusively for opioid prevention,
intervention, treatment, recovery, and harm reduction services, co-occurring
mental health conditions, and co-occurring substance use disorders.
(2) The Department shall submit a spending plan to the General
Assembly, informed by the recommendations of the Opioid Settlement
Advisory Committee established pursuant to section 4772 of this subchapter,
annually on or before January 15 and once funding is appropriated by the
General Assembly from the Opioid Abatement Special Fund, the Department
shall request to have the funds formally released from the national abatement
account fund, the national opioid abatement trust, the supplemental opioid
abatement fund, or any other settlement funds that must be utilized exclusively
for opioid prevention, intervention, treatment, recovery, and harm reduction
services, co-occurring mental health conditions, and co-occurring substance
use disorders. The Department shall disburse monies from the Opioid
Abatement Special Fund pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 3.
* * *
VT LEG #390224 v.1

No. 141 Page 9 of 12
2026
Sec. 7. APPROPRIATION REVIEW; FISCAL YEAR 2028 PROPOSAL
SUSPENSION
Notwithstanding 18 V.S.A. § 4772(e), the Opioid Settlement Advisory
Committee shall not accept funding proposals or make funding
recommendations from the Opioid Abatement Special Fund for fiscal year
2028, unless a program or initiative was previously identified in statute as
intended for annual funding. It instead shall review the outcomes of programs
and initiatives previously funded through the Opioid Abatement Special Fund
to assess effectiveness, long-term sustainability, and the appropriateness of the
Opioid Abatement Special Fund as a funding source, where applicable, to
inform recommendations made in fiscal year 2029 and thereafter.
Sec. 8. QUARTERLY REPORTING; EXPENDITURE OF OPIOID
ABATEMENT SPECIAL FUND MONIES
The Department of Health shall submit to the General Assembly quarterly
reports regarding expenditures from the Opioid Abatement Special Fund.
Specifically, the reports shall identify funds appropriated from the Special
Fund that remain unobligated or unspent, or both, and shall include an
explanation as to why the funds have not been fully distributed. Reports due
on October 1, 2026, and July 1, 2027, shall be submitted to the Joint Fiscal
Committee. Reports due on January 1, 2027, and April 1, 2027, shall be
submitted to the House Committees on Appropriations and on Human Services
and to the Senate Committees on Appropriations and on Health and Welfare.
VT LEG #390224 v.1

No. 141 Page 10 of 12
2026
The Department shall post reports required pursuant to this section on its
website.
Sec. 9. REVERSIONS
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in fiscal year 2027,
the following amounts shall revert to the Opioid Abatement Special Fund from
the accounts indicated:
3420892313 VDH-Opioid Sp. Fund Prov Satellites $444,000.00
3420892313 VDH-Opioid Sp. Fund Wound Care $8,287.34
3420892501 VDH-Opioid Sp. Fund Stabilization Beds $1,000,000.00
* * * Syringe Recovery Plan * * *
Sec. 10. PLAN; SYRINGE RECOVERY
On or before December 15, 2026, the Department of Health shall submit a
plan to the House Committee on Human Services and to the Senate Committee
on Health and Welfare containing recommendations for the implementation of
one or more syringe recovery models throughout the State to enhance public
health and safety. The plan shall require syringe service providers to report to
the Department on the percentage of distributed syringes that are returned to
the provider or otherwise collected.
* * * Substance Misuse Prevention Special Fund * * *
Sec. 11. APPROPRIATIONS; SUBSTANCE MISUSE PREVENTION
SPECIAL FUND
VT LEG #390224 v.1

No. 141 Page 11 of 12
2026
In fiscal year 2027, the following monies shall be appropriated from the
Substance Misuse Prevention Special Fund established pursuant to 18 V.S.A.
§ 4812:
(1) $288,935.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to Elevate
Youth Services to support the creation of a low-barrier, drop-in teen center in
Barre to provide food, activities, positive adults role models, peer counselors,
prevention and recovery programming, and direct connection to treatments;
(2) $124,999.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to the
Greater Falls Connections to enhance youth engagement and education and to
expand prevention-focused staffing and youth programming space in response
to increasing community need;
(3) $200,000.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to
Interaction: Friends for Change to increase access to community-based
therapy, housing, crisis, medical, recovery, and employment supports for youth
in Windham County; and
(4) $26,697.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to Winooski
Partnership for Prevention to provide funding for staff time and stipends for
partners to deliver medicine safety education to elementary-aged youth during
school with family engagement.
Sec. 12. 18 V.S.A. § 4812 is amended to read:
§ 4812. SUBSTANCE MISUSE PREVENTION SPECIAL FUND
* * *
VT LEG #390224 v.1

No. 141 Page 12 of 12
2026
(e) As part of its annual budget presentation, the Department shall report to
the House Committees on Appropriations and on Human Services and to the
Senate Committees on Appropriations and on Health and Welfare on its
specific spending proposal from the Substance Misuse Prevention Special
Fund for the coming fiscal year. The report shall include an estimate of the
monies in the Special Fund anticipated to remain unallocated at the end of the
fiscal year.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 13. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
Date Governor signed bill: June 16, 2026
VT LEG #390224 v.1